dictsource/ady_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Adyghe


// Consonants
.L01  б в г гу гъ гъу д дж дз дзу ж жъ жъу жь з к ку къ къу кI кIу л лъ лI м н п пI пIу р с т тI тIу ф х хъ хъу хь ц цу цI ч чI чъ ш шъ шъу шI шIу щ I Iу


.group а
   а       a:
   а (_   'a:
   а (L01_ 'a:

.group б
   б       b

.group в
   в       v

.group г
   г       g
   гу      gw
   гъ      Q"
   гъу     Q"w

.group д
   д       d
   дж      dZ
   дз      dz
   дзу     dzw

.group е 
    _)  е  ja
   е       aj
   е (_    j'a
   е (L01_ j'a

.group ё
   ё       jo
   ё (_    j'o
   ё (L01_ j'o

.group ж
   ж       Z
   жъ      z.
   жъу     Zw
   жь      Z;

.group з
   з       z

.group и
   и       i
   и (_   'i
   и (L01_ 'i

.group й
   й       j

.group к
   к       k
   ку      kw
   къ      q
   къу     qw
   кI      k`
   кIу     k`w

.group л
   л       l
   лъ      l#
   лI      l#?

.group м
   м       m

.group н
   н       n

.group о
   о       wa
   о (_    w'a
   о (L01_ w'a

.group п
   п       p
   пI      p`
   пIу     p`w

.group р
   р       r

.group с
   с       s

.group т
   т       t
   тI      t`
   тIу     t`w

.group у
   у       w3
   у (_    w'3
   у (L01_ w'3

.group ф
   ф       f

.group х
   х       x
   хъ      X
   хъу     Xw
   хь      H

.group ц
   ц       ts
   цу      tsw
   цI      ts`?

.group ч
   ч       tS;
   чI      tS`
   чъ      ts.

.group ш
   ш       S
   шъ      s.
   шъу     Sw
   шI      S?
   шIу     S?w

.group щ
   щ       S;

.group ъ
   ъ

.group ы
   ы       @
   ы (_   '@
   ы (L01_ '@

.group ь
   ь

.group э
   э       a
   э (_   'a
   э (L01_ 'a

.group ю
   ю       ju
   ю (_    j'u
   ю (L01_ j'u

.group я
   я       ja
   я (_    j'a
   я (L01_ j'a

.group Ӏ
   Ӏ       ?
   Ӏу      ?w
